Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-729
Nebraska Hall of Fame Commission; powers.

The Nebraska Hall of Fame Commission shall have power:

(1) To contract for the making and placing of busts or other appropriate objects commemorating the persons chosen to be placed in the State Capitol or other location as approved by the commission. No busts or other appropriate objects commemorating the persons chosen shall be placed in the State Capitol except upon the approval of the Nebraska Capitol Commission; and

(2) To receive and disburse gifts.

Laws 1963, c. 414, § 1, p. 1336;

Laws 1974, LB 1048, § 40;

Laws 1993, LB 311, § 2;

Laws 1998, LB 1129, § 7.